Florida, session 2026F, HB3F.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
49
50 Section 1. Paragraphs (l) and (m) of subsection (8) of
Page 2 of 30
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb3f-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 3F 2026F
51 section 200.001, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
52 200.001 Millages; definitions and general provisions.—
53 (8)
54 (l) "Maximum total county ad valorem taxes levied" means
55 the total taxes levied by a county, municipal service taxing
56 units of that county, and special districts dependent to that
57 county at their individual maximum millages, authorized
58 calculated pursuant to s. 200.065(5)(a) for fiscal years 2009-
59 2010 and thereafter.
60 (m) "Maximum total municipal ad valorem taxes levied"
61 means the total taxes levied by a municipality and special
62 districts dependent to that municipality at their individual
63 maximum millages, authorized calculated pursuant to s.
64 200.065(5)(a) s. 200.065(5)(b) for fiscal years 2009-2010 and
65 thereafter.
66 Section 2. Paragraphs (b) and (d) of subsection (2) and
67 subsection (5) of section 200.065, Florida Statutes, are
68 amended, and paragraph (c) is added to subsection (14) of that
69 section, to read:
70 200.065 Method of fixing millage.—
71 (2) No millage shall be levied until a resolution or
72 ordinance has been approved by the governing board of the taxing
73 authority which resolution or ordinance must be approved by the
74 taxing authority according to the following procedure:
75 (b)1. Within 35 days of certification of value pursuant to
Page 3 of 30
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb3f-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 3F 2026F
76 subsection (1), each taxing authority shall advise the property
77 appraiser of its proposed millage rate, of its rolled-back rate
78 computed pursuant to subsection (1), and of the date, time, and
79 place at which a public hearing will be held to consider the
80 proposed millage rate and the tentative budget. The property
81 appraiser shall utilize this information in preparing the notice
82 of proposed property taxes pursuant to s. 200.069. The deadline
83 for mailing the notice shall be the later of 55 days after
84 certification of value pursuant to subsection (1) or 10 days
85 after either the date the tax roll is approved or the interim
86 roll procedures under s. 193.1145 are instituted. However, for
87 counties for which a state of emergency was declared by
88 executive order or proclamation of the Governor pursuant to
89 chapter 252, if mailing is not possible during the state of
90 emergency, the property appraiser may post the notice on the
91 county's website. If the deadline for mailing the notice of
92 proposed property taxes is 10 days after the date the tax roll
93 is approved or the interim roll procedures are instituted, all
94 subsequent deadlines provided in this section shall be extended.
95 In addition, the deadline for mailing the notice may be extended
96 for 30 days in counties for which a state of emergency was
97 declared by executive order or proclamation of the Governor
98 pursuant to chapter 252, and property appraisers may use
99 alternate methods of distribution only when mailing the notice
100 is not possible. In such event, however, property appraisers
Page 4 of 30
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb3f-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 3F 2026F
101 must work with county tax collectors to ensure the timely
102 assessment and collection of taxes. The number of days by which
103 the deadlines shall be extended shall equal the number of days
104 by which the deadline for mailing the notice of proposed taxes
105 is extended beyond 55 days after certification. If any taxing
106 authority fails to provide the information required in this
107 paragraph to the property appraiser in a timely fashion, the
108 taxing authority shall be prohibited from levying a millage rate
109 greater than the rolled-back rate computed pursuant to
110 subsection (1) for the upcoming fiscal year, which rate shall be
111 computed by the property appraiser and used in preparing the
112 notice of proposed property taxes. Each multicounty taxing
113 authority that levies taxes in any county that has extended the
114 deadline for mailing the notice due to a declared state of
115 emergency and that has noticed hearings in other counties must
116 advertise the hearing at which it intends to adopt a tentative
117 budget and millage rate in a newspaper of general paid
118 circulation within each county not less than 2 days or more than
119 5 days before the hearing.
120 2. When mailing notices required pursuant to this
121 paragraph, the property appraiser must include the notice
122 required pursuant to s. 200.069(10) if a joint resolution
123 proposing an amendment or a revision to ss. 4, 6, and 9, Art.
124 VII of the State Constitution is to be submitted to the electors
125 at the next general election.
Page 5 of 30
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb3f-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 3F 2026F
126 (d) Within 15 days after the meeting adopting the
127 tentative budget, the taxing authority shall advertise in a
128 newspaper of general circulation in the county as provided in
129 subsection (3), its intent to finally adopt a millage rate and
130 budget. A public hearing to finalize the budget and adopt a
131 millage rate shall be held not less than 2 days nor more than 5
132 days after the day that the advertisement is first published. In
133 the event of a need to postpone or recess the final meeting due
134 to a declared state of emergency, the taxing authority may
135 postpone or recess the hearing for up to 7 days and shall post a
136 prominent notice at the place of the original hearing showing
137 the date, time, and place where the hearing will be reconvened.
138 The posted notice shall measure not less than 8.5 by 11 inches.
139 The taxing authority shall make every reasonable effort to
140 provide reasonable notification of the continued hearing to the
141 taxpayers. The information must also be posted on the taxing
142 authority's website. During the hearing, the governing body of
143 the taxing authority shall amend the adopted tentative budget as
144 it sees fit, adopt a final budget, and adopt a resolution or
145 ordinance stating the millage rate to be levied. The resolution
146 or ordinance shall state the percent, if any, by which the
147 millage rate to be levied exceeds the rolled-back rate computed
148 pursuant to subsection (1), which shall be characterized as the
149 percentage increase in property taxes adopted by the governing
150 body. The adoption of the budget and the millage-levy resolution
Page 6 of 30
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb3f-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 3F 2026F
151 or ordinance shall be by separate votes. For each taxing
152 authority levying millage, the name of the taxing authority, the
153 rolled-back rate, the percentage increase, and the millage rate
154 to be levied shall be publicly announced before the adoption of
155 the millage-levy resolution or ordinance. In no event may the
156 millage rate adopted pursuant to this paragraph exceed the
157 millage rate tentatively adopted pursuant to paragraph (c).
158 1. If the rate tentatively adopted pursuant to paragraph
159 (c) exceeds the proposed rate provided to the property appraiser
160 pursuant to paragraph (b), or as subsequently adjusted pursuant
161 to subsection (11), each taxpayer within the jurisdiction of the
162 taxing authority shall be sent notice by first-class mail of his
163 or her taxes under the tentatively adopted millage rate and his
164 or her taxes under the previously proposed rate. The notice must
165 be prepared by the property appraiser, at the expense of the
166 taxing authority, and must generally conform to the requirements
167 of s. 200.069. If such additional notice is necessary, its
168 mailing must precede the hearing held pursuant to this paragraph
169 by not less than 10 days and not more than 15 days.
170 2. When mailing notices required pursuant to subparagraph
171 1., the property appraiser must include the notice required
172 pursuant to s. 200.069(10) if a joint resolution proposing an
173 amendment or a revision to ss. 4, 6, and 9, Art. VII of the
174 State Constitution is to be submitted to the electors at the
175 next general election.
Page 7 of 30
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb3f-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 3F 2026F
176 (5) In each fiscal year:
177 (a) The maximum millage rate that a county, municipality,
178 special district dependent to a county or municipality,
179 municipal service taxing unit, or independent special district
180 may levy is the a rolled-back rate computed pursuant to
181 subsection (1) based on the amount of taxes which would have
182 been levied in the prior year if the maximum millage rate had
183 been applied, adjusted for change in per capita Florida personal
184 income, unless a higher rate was adopted, in which case the
185 maximum is the adopted rate. The maximum millage rate applicable
186 to a county authorized to levy a county public hospital surtax
187 under s. 212.055 and which did so in fiscal year 2007 shall
188 exclude the revenues required to be contributed to the county
189 public general hospital in the current fiscal year for the
190 purposes of making the maximum millage rate calculation, but
191 shall be added back to the maximum millage rate allowed after
192 the roll back has been applied, the total of which shall be
193 considered the maximum millage rate for such a county for
194 purposes of this subsection. The revenue required to be
195 contributed to the county public general hospital for the
196 upcoming fiscal year shall be calculated as 11.873 percent times
197 the millage rate levied for countywide purposes in fiscal year
198 2007 times 95 percent of the preliminary tax roll for the
199 upcoming fiscal year. A higher rate may be adopted only under
200 the following conditions:
Page 8 of 30
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb3f-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 3F 2026F
201 1. A rate of not more than 110 percent of the rolled-back
202 rate based on the previous year's maximum millage rate, adjusted
203 for change in per capita Florida personal income, may be adopted
204 if approved by a two-thirds vote of the membership of the
205 governing body of the county, municipality, or independent
206 district; or
207 2. A rate in excess of 110 percent may be adopted if
208 approved by a unanimous vote of the membership of the governing
209 body of the county, municipality, or independent district or by
210 a three-fourths vote of the membership of the governing body if
211 the governing body has nine or more members, or if the rate is
212 approved by a referendum.
213 (b) The millage rate of a county or municipality,
214 municipal service taxing unit of that county, and any special
215 district dependent to that county or municipality may exceed the
216 maximum millage rate authorized calculated pursuant to this
217 subsection if the total county ad valorem taxes levied or total
218 municipal ad valorem taxes levied do not exceed the maximum
219 total county ad valorem taxes levied or maximum total municipal
220 ad valorem taxes levied, respectively. Voted millage and taxes
221 levied by a municipality or independent special district that
222 has levied ad valorem taxes for less than 5 years are not
223 subject to this limitation. The millage rate of a county
224 authorized to levy a county public hospital surtax under s.
225 212.055 may exceed the maximum millage rate authorized
Page 9 of 30
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb3f-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 3F 2026F
226 calculated pursuant to this subsection to the extent necessary
227 to account for the revenues required to be contributed to the
228 county public hospital. Total taxes levied may exceed the
229 maximum calculated pursuant to subsection (6) as a result of an
230 increase in taxable value above that certified in subsection (1)
231 if such increase is less than the percentage amounts contained
232 in subsection (6) or if the administrative adjustment cannot be
233 made because the value adjustment board is still in session at
234 the time the tax roll is extended; otherwise, millage rates
235 subject to this subsection may be reduced so that total taxes
236 levied do not exceed the maximum.
237
238 Any unit of government operating under a home rule charter
239 adopted pursuant to ss. 10, 11, and 24, Art. VIII of the State
240 Constitution of 1885, as preserved by s. 6(e), Art. VIII of the
241 State Constitution, which is granted the authority in the State
242 Constitution to exercise all the powers conferred now or
243 hereafter by general law upon municipalities and which exercises
244 such powers in the unincorporated area shall be recognized as a
245 municipality under this subsection. For a downtown development
246 authority established before the effective date of the State
247 Constitution which has a millage that must be approved by a
248 municipality, the governing body of that municipality shall be
249 considered the governing body of the downtown development
250 authority for purposes of this subsection.
Page 10 of 30
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb3f-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 3F 2026F
251 (14)
252 (c) When mailing notices required pursuant to this
253 subsection, the property appraiser must include the notice
254 required pursuant to s. 200.069(10) if a joint resolution
255 proposing an amendment or a revision to ss. 4, 6, and 9, Art.
256 VII of the State Constitution is to be submitted to the electors
257 at the next general election.
258 Section 3. Section 200.069, Florida Statutes, is amended
259 to read:
260 200.069 Notice of proposed property taxes and non-ad
261 valorem assessments.—Pursuant to s. 200.065(2)(b), the property
262 appraiser, in the name of the taxing authorities and local
263 governing boards levying non-ad valorem assessments within his
264 or her jurisdiction and at the expense of the county, shall
265 prepare and deliver by first-class mail to each taxpayer to be
266 listed on the current year's assessment roll a notice of
267 proposed property taxes, which notice shall contain the elements
268 and use the format provided in the following form.
269 Notwithstanding the provisions of s. 195.022, no county officer
270 shall use a form other than that provided herein. The Department
271 of Revenue may adjust the spacing and placement on the form of
272 the elements listed in this section as it considers necessary
273 based on changes in conditions necessitated by various taxing
274 authorities. If the elements are in the order listed, the
275 placement of the listed columns may be varied at the discretion
Page 11 of 30
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb3f-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 3F 2026F
276 and expense of the property appraiser, and the property
277 appraiser may use printing technology and devices to complete
278 the form, the spacing, and the placement of the information in
279 the columns. Except for the notice required under subsection
280 (10) In addition, the property appraiser may not include in the
281 mailing of the notice of ad valorem taxes and non-ad valorem
282 assessments additional information or items unless such
283 information or items explain a component of the notice or
284 provide information directly related to the assessment and
285 taxation of the property. Except for the notice required under
286 subsection (10), a county officer may use a form other than that
287 provided by the department for purposes of this part, but only
288 if his or her office pays the related expenses and he or she
289 obtains prior written permission from the executive director of
290 the department; however, a county officer may not use a form the
291 substantive content of which is at variance with the form
292 prescribed by the department. The county officer may continue to
293 use such an approved form until the law that specifies the form
294 is amended or repealed or until the officer receives written
295 disapproval from the executive director.
296 (1) The first page of the notice shall read:
297
298 NOTICE OF PROPOSED PROPERTY TAXES
299 DO NOT PAY—THIS IS NOT A BILL
300
Page 12 of 30
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb3f-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 3F 2026F
301 The taxing authorities which levy property taxes against
302 your property will soon hold PUBLIC HEARINGS to adopt budgets
303 and tax rates for the next year.
304 The purpose of these PUBLIC HEARINGS is to receive opinions
305 from the general public and to answer questions on the proposed
306 tax change and budget PRIOR TO TAKING FINAL ACTION.
307 Each taxing authority may AMEND OR ALTER its proposals at
308 the hearing.
309
310 (2)(a) The notice shall include a brief legal description
311 of the property, the name and mailing address of the owner of
312 record, and the tax information applicable to the specific
313 parcel in question. The information shall be in columnar form.
314 There shall be seven column headings which shall read: "Taxing
315 Authority," "Your Property Taxes Last Year," "Last Year's
316 Adjusted Tax Rate (Millage)," "Your Taxes This Year IF NO Budget
317 Change Is Adopted," "Tax Rate This Year IF PROPOSED Budget Is
318 Adopted (Millage)," "Your Taxes This Year IF PROPOSED Budget
319 Change Is Adopted," and "A Public Hearing on the Proposed Taxes
320 and Budget Will Be Held:."
321 (b) As used in this section, the term "last year's
322 adjusted tax rate" means the rolled-back rate calculated
323 pursuant to s. 200.065(1).
324 (3) There shall be under each column heading an entry for
325 the county; the school district levy required pursuant to s.
Page 13 of 30
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb3f-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 3F 2026F
326 1011.60(6); other operating school levies; the municipality or
327 municipal service taxing unit or units in which the parcel lies,
328 if any; the water management district levying pursuant to s.
329 373.503; the independent special districts in which the parcel
330 lies, if any; and for all voted levies for debt service
331 applicable to the parcel, if any.
332 (4) For each entry listed in subsection (3), there shall
333 appear on the notice the following:
334 (a) In the first column, a brief, commonly used name for
335 the taxing authority or its governing body. The entry in the
336 first column for the levy required pursuant to s. 1011.60(6)
337 shall be "By State Law." The entry for other operating school
338 district levies shall be "By Local Board." Both school levy
339 entries shall be indented and preceded by the notation "Public
340 Schools:". For each voted levy for debt service, the entry shall
341 be "Voter Approved Debt Payments."
342 (b) In the second column, the gross amount of ad valorem
343 taxes levied against the parcel in the previous year. If the
344 parcel did not exist in the previous year, the second column
345 shall be blank.
346 (c) In the third column, last year's adjusted tax rate or,
347 in the case of voted levies for debt service, the tax rate
348 previously authorized by referendum.
349 (d) In the fourth column, the gross amount of ad valorem
350 taxes which will apply to the parcel in the current year if each
Page 14 of 30
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb3f-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 3F 2026F
351 taxing authority levies last year's adjusted tax rate or, in the
352 case of voted levies for debt service, the amount previously
353 authorized by referendum.
354 (e) In the fifth column, the tax rate that each taxing
355 authority must levy against the parcel to fund the proposed
356 budget or, in the case of voted levies for debt service, the tax
357 rate previously authorized by referendum.
358 (f) In the sixth column, the gross amount of ad valorem
359 taxes that must be levied in the current year if the proposed
360 budget is adopted.
361 (g) In the seventh column, the date, the time, and a brief
362 description of the location of the public hearing required
363 pursuant to s. 200.065(2)(c).
364 (5) Following the entries for each taxing authority, a
365 final entry shall show: in the first column, the words "Total
366 Property Taxes:" and in the second, fourth, and sixth columns,
367 the sum of the entries for each of the individual taxing
368 authorities. The second, fourth, and sixth columns shall,
369 immediately below said entries, be labeled Column 1, Column 2,
370 and Column 3, respectively. Below these labels shall appear, in
371 boldfaced type, the statement: SEE REVERSE SIDE FOR EXPLANATION.
372 (6)(a) The second page of the notice shall state the
373 parcel's market value and for each taxing authority that levies
374 an ad valorem tax against the parcel:
375 1. The assessed value, value of exemptions, and taxable
Page 15 of 30
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb3f-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 3F 2026F
376 value for the previous year and the current year.
377 2. Each assessment reduction and exemption applicable to
378 the property, including the value of the assessment reduction or
379 exemption and tax levies to which they apply.
380 (b) The reverse side of the second page shall contain
381 definitions and explanations for the values included on the
382 front side.
383 (7) The following statement shall appear after the values
384 listed on the front of the second page:
385
386 If you feel that the market value of your property is
387 inaccurate or does not reflect fair market value, or if you are
388 entitled to an exemption or classification that is not reflected
389 above, contact your county property appraiser at ...(phone
390 number)... or ...(location)....
391 If the property appraiser's office is unable to resolve the
392 matter as to market value, classification, or an exemption, you
393 may file a petition for adjustment with the Value Adjustment
394 Board. Petition forms are available from the county property
395 appraiser and must be filed ON OR BEFORE ...(date)....
396 (8) The reverse side of the first page of the form shall
397 read:
398